Alaska, session 34, HB165.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 14.03 is amended by adding a new section to read: 05 Sec. 14.03.065. Maximum classroom size. (a) Except for an art, library, 06 music, computer science, vocational-technical, or physical education course, the 07 maximum number of students a public school may place in a classroom is 23 for 08 grades kindergarten through three, 26 for grades four through eight, and 30 for grades 09 nine through 12. This subsection does not apply to a district with an average daily 10 membership of 35,000 or less in the previous school year. 11 (b) A district shall, by November 30 and February 1 of each year, provide 12 notice to each student's parent or guardian of 13 (1) the classroom size requirements of this section; 14 (2) the average classroom size for each grade level at each school in 01 the district for the current school year; and 02 (3) the number of students in the student's classroom. 03 (c) The number of students placed in a classroom in a public school may 04 exceed the maximum number set out in (a) of this section if the excess is caused by 05 one or more students transferring to the school after the first day of the current school 06 term. 07 (d) In this section, 08 (1) "average daily membership" has the meaning given in 09 AS 14.17.990; 10 (2) "district" has the meaning given in AS 14.17.990. 11 * Sec. 2. This Act takes effect July 1, 2026. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.